Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General
§ 1-22-110.
When adoption permitted without consent.

In addition to the exceptions contained in W.S.

1-22-108

, the adoption of a child may be ordered without the written consent of a parent or the putative father if the court finds that the nonconsenting parent or putative father is unknown and that the putative father has not registered under W.S.

1-22-117

and the affidavit required by W.S. 1-22-109(a)(iv) has been filed with the petition to adopt or if the court finds that the putative father or the nonconsenting parent or parents have:

Been given notice of the hearing as provided in W.S.

1-22-107

and has failed to answer or appear at the hearing; or

Been judicially deprived of parental rights of the child for any reason; or

Willfully abandoned or deserted the child; or

Willfully failed to contribute to the support of the child for a period of one (1) year immediately prior to the filing of the petition to adopt and has failed to bring the support obligation current within sixty (60) days after service of the petition to adopt; or

Willfully permitted the child to be maintained in or by a public or private institution or by the department of family services for a period of one (1) year immediately prior to the filing of the petition without substantially contributing to the support of the child; or

Failed, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the pending birth or birth of the child, to advise or notify the agency which gave the putative father the notice of pending birth or birth of his interest in or responsibility for the child or his declaration of paternity; or

Been adjudged by a court to be guilty of cruelty, abuse, neglect or mistreatment of the child; or

Caused the conception of the child born out of wedlock as a result of sexual assault or incest for which he has been convicted; or

Willfully failed to pay a total dollar amount of at least seventy percent (70%) of the court ordered support for a period of two (2) years or more and has failed to bring the support obligation one hundred percent (100%) current within sixty (60) days after service of the petition to adopt.

Any petition filed pursuant to paragraphs (a)(iv) or (ix) of this section shall contain a clear statement of the consequences of the respondent’s failure to bring the support obligation current.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 2, § 9; Laws 1879, ch. 1, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2282; R.S. 1899, § 3023; C.S. 1910, § 3960; C.S. 1920, § 5026; R.S. 1931, § 20-212; C.S. 1945, § 58-213; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-710.2, 1-719, 1-726.10; Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 8; 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1990, ch. 106, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 84, § 1; 1995, ch. 170, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial termination of parental rights, see §

14-2-308

et seq. As to child protective services, see §

14-3-201

et seq.

Section is not unconstitutional

because it allegedly has different standards for terminating parental rights than §

14-2-309

(grounds for termination of parental-child legal relationship). The two sections do not serve identical purposes. In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985).

Section does not provide for termination of parental rights;

rather, it provides for adoption without consent under the conditions set forth in the statute. In re Adoption of SLS, 808 P.2d 207,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1991).

District court properly
treated §

1-22-108

(c) as a complete and independent adoption statute,

regardless of whether this section might also apply. This section
provides a set of circumstances, such as the nonconsenting party's
abuse, abandonment or failure to support the child, under which an
adoption is justified no matter who the nonconsenting party is. But
the more liberal adoption test of
§

1-22-108

applies to only those adoptions contested by putative
fathers who have already shown their lack of concern for their children
by failing to establish legal paternity.
In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

“Or” defined. —

See In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Parental rights already terminated. —

Adoption court did not err in granting the foster parents’ petition for adoption because service by publication upon an unknown father was proper at the time that it was completed, and the court in the termination case obtained jurisdiction over the parties and terminated the father’s parental rights; nothing on the face of the termination order or the record indicated that the district court subsequently lost jurisdiction; the father’s collateral attack on the termination order could not be maintained in the adoption case; and the father did not have standing to object to or otherwise participate in the adoption proceeding as his parental rights had already been terminated, and he had no legally protectable interest at stake. RB v. State (In re SSO), 2017 WY 142, 406 P.3d 723,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2017).

Strict construction. —

When a proceeding is against a nonconsenting parent in an adoption proceeding the statute must be strictly construed and every reasonable intendment is made in favor of the nonconsenting parent's claims. In re Adoption of Narragon, 530 P.2d 413,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1975); In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975); In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976); In re Adoption of CCT, 640 P.2d 73,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1982); MVC v. MB (In re SMR), 982 P.2d 1246,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1999).

When an adoption proceeding is contested by a nonconsenting parent, this section must be strictly construed and every reasonable intendment made in favor of the nonconsenting parent's claims. MVC v. MB (In re SMR), 982 P.2d 1246,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1999).

As used in context of subsection (a)(iv), “willfully” means

intentionally, knowingly, purposely, voluntarily, consciously, deliberately and without justifiable excuse, as distinguished from carelessly, inadvertently, accidentally, negligently, heedlessly or thoughtlessly. In re Adoption of CCT, 640 P.2d 73,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1982).

Willful failure to contribute financially. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in denying a petition filed by a mother and stepfather to adopt a child because it carefully weighed conflicting evidence, determined credibility, and came to a reasonable conclusion; the district court specifically considered the willfulness of the father’s failure to financially support the child, and despite that evidence, it concluded other factors outweighed those concerns under the circumstances. JEG v. BCB (In re ZEM), 2020 WY 17, 458 P.3d 21,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2020).

Jury trial. —

Although Wyoming law guarantees a right to jury trial in a proceeding to terminate parental rights, there is no such guarantee in a proceeding involving adoption in the absence of parental consent; because adoption statutes are strictly construed, this means there is no right at all. MTM v. LD (In re KJD), 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Evidence held sufficient.—

District court could reasonably rely on a mother’s expenditures on substance abuse evaluations, housing, and pursuing better and higher paying employment, both during and outside the two-year period at issue, in evaluating the mother’s intent and ability to pay child support. The evidence was sufficient to support the district court’s conclusion that the mother had not forgotten her statutory obligation to her children and that the father and stepmother failed to prove the mother’s willfulness by clear and convincing evidence. CML v. ADBL (In re CJML), 2020 WY 23, 458 P.3d 53,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2020).

Abandonment by father. —

Where a father has relinquished all claims on his minor child by abandonment, his consent to adoption of such child is unnecessary, and notice need not be served on him of proceedings for such adoption on the application of the mother. Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1893).

Mother adjudged guilty of neglect. —

Regardless of the errors or mistakes the Wyoming Department of Family Services might have made in the juvenile proceeding, the reality was that the mother admitted the neglect allegations and the district court entered an order of final disposition, concluding that the child was a neglected child; the mother did not object to, or appeal from, that final disposition order finding her guilty of neglect. Furthermore, the mother could not challenge the validity of the neglect order in the adoption proceeding; thus, the district court did not abuse its discretion by concluding that the mother's consent to the child's adoption was not required under subsection (a)(vii) of this section because the mother had been adjudged guilty of neglecting the child. TF v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re CF), 2005 WY 118, 120 P.3d 992,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2005).

District court did not abuse its discretion by concluding that the mother's consent to the child's adoption was not required under subsection (a)(iv) of this section because the district court simply made a misstatement when it referred to the preponderance of the evidence standard in its decision letter because there was clear and convincing evidence to support the finding that (1) the mother willfully failed to contribute to the child's support during the one year preceding the filing of the adoption petition; and (2) the substantial child support payments that the mother did make were untimely as they were made more than 60 days after service of the adoption petition. The TF v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re CF), 2005 WY 118, 120 P.3d 992,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence and burden of proof of abandonment. —

When the matter in controversy is whether a parent has abandoned his child so as to have dispensed with the necessity of his consent, the burden of proof is on the party seeking to justify the adoption on that ground and the evidence to show abandonment must be clear and convincing. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence held insufficient

to show abandonment. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Sufficient record. —

With respect to a district court's finding that a biological father's consent to an adoption of his daughter was not required pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-22-110

, because the father, who conceded that he not paid at lease 70 percent of court--ordered child support for two years or more, failed to meet his burden of providing a sufficient record to allow proper evaluation of the district court's decision, the district court's findings were assumed to be adequately supported.
MJH v. AV (In re JRH), 2006 WY 89, 138 P.3d 683,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2006).

There was no showing of abandonment

where all the proof submitted demonstrated some parental inattention and neglect, which may in some manner have been explained by the bad feeling between petitioners and the mother's husband and which did not contribute to the joy of any such reunion. In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

There was no showing of abandonment by clear and convincing evidence, or otherwise, where the district court found that the father made monthly telephone calls and wrote occasional letters to his daughter while he was in prison; when considering abandonment, the trial court should consider whether an incarcerated nonconsenting parent, unable to fulfill the customary duties of an unrestrained parent, has nonetheless pursued the opportunities and options which may be available to carry out such duties to the best of his ability. TOC v. TND (In re TLC), 2002 WY 76, 46 P.3d 863,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2002).

Abandonment is more than temporary absence or neglect.

In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

Evidence of such abandonment

must be clear and convincing. In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

Intention to abandon. —

A mother's refusal of an earlier request to give a written consent to the adoption of her child by petitioners belied an intention to abandon the child. In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

Willful failure to contribute financially. —

Guardians failed to present clear and convincing evidence that mother willfully failed to financially contribute to support of her child, and therefore trial court properly denied guardians' petition for adoption. MVC v. MB (In re SMR), 982 P.2d 1246,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1999).

Adoption without the mother's consent was proper because the evidence did not support her assertion that she lacked the ability to pay child support. She voluntarily quit her job after being ordered to pay child support and did not register for any employment services or complete any educational programs; and although she earned some money from babysitting while her parents were paying all of her living expenses, she paid none of it toward her child support obligation.
EOS v. JLS (In re Adoption of RMS), 2011 WY 78, 253 P.3d 149,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2011).

Adoption without the father's consent was proper because the father's willful failure to contribute to the support of his child was supported by evidence showing that the father was unemployed for an entire year but did not engage the assistance of a job service agency and did not seek to advance his employment prospects through college courses or job training, the father received military pay before he was served with the adoption petition and did not contribute any of it to his child support obligation, and the father gave shifting testimony as to the timing of his attempt to create a military allotment to pay child support.
DLH v. JLA (In re AMP), 2012 WY 132,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(2012).

Need to prove willful failure to bring child support
payments
current. —

Proof of willfulness in the nonconsenting father's failure to bring his child support obligation current within 60 days after service of the adoption petition was unnecessary because in the second clause of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-22-110(a)(iv), as opposed to the first, “failed” was not modified by the word “willfully,” indicating that the obligation to bring child support payments current existed irrespective of the delinquent parent's state of mind; it was indisputed that the father did not pay his accumulated arrearages.
DLH v. JLA (In re AMP), 2012 WY 132, 286 P.3d 746,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2012).

There was no showing of willful nonpayment of support. —

The district court's finding, that the father's failure to pay child support was a consequence of incarceration which was of his own making and willful, was clearly erroneous in relying on incarceration as a grounds for dispensing with the need for the father's consent, and the district court's other findings, which included that while incarcerated the father made minimal support payments, and that since his release the father's support had been “reasonable and substantial,” precluded a finding that the statute has been satisfied. TOC v. TND (In re TLC), 2002 WY 76, 46 P.3d 863,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2002).

Two year period of willful nonpayment. —

The two year period of willful failure to pay court ordered support referred to in § 1-22-110(a)(ix) means the two years or more immediately prior to the filing of the petition to adopt. TOC v. TND (In re TLC), 2002 WY 76, 46 P.3d 863,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2002).

Intent to terminate parental ties. —

There must be, in order to constitute abandonment, an actual intent to terminate the parental ties and a purpose to relinquish parental claims. In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

In Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948), decided under a former statute, it was said that abandonment imports conduct by the parent “… which evinces a settled purpose to forego all parental duties and relinquish all parental claims to the child.” It involves more than temporary absence or neglect of parental duty. There must be evidence that, at some time, parental interests, duties and obligations have been definitely dropped. Strauser recognizes that in some circumstances failure to furnish money is quite important; subsections (c) and (d) of this section retain that point of view. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

It is of little or no importance if the persons in temporary care of the children are volunteers, who expect no assistance from the parent. In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975).

Where mother had infrequent but continuing contact with her child and initiated proceedings to terminate guardianship on one occasion, and later sought legal advice regarding restoration of her custody of child, there was no showing of an actual intent to terminate parental ties on mother's part. MVC v. MB (In re SMR), 982 P.2d 1246,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1999).

Withholding contributions deemed willful failure to contribute.
—

The withholding of contributions to the support of the children was, under the circumstances, a willful failure to contribute to the support of the children, even though the father was denied his rights of visitation. In re Adoption of CHJ, 778 P.2d 124,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1989).

Where a husband acknowledged that his former wife was on welfare and had requested support money from him, that he had been steadily employed, earning $5.00 and $6.00 an hour, that his failure to furnish some support money was not due to inadvertence, carelessness or thoughtlessness and that he knew of the whereabouts of his wife and his children, and where he did not present any justifiable excuse for failure to contribute to the support of his children, the trial court did not err in finding such failure to be “willful.” In re Adoption of G.A.R., 810 P.2d 113,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1991).

Willfully Allowed Child To Remain in Custody of Institution
Without Contributing to Child's Support —. —

District court did not abuse its discretion by concluding that the mother's consent to the child's adoption was not required under subsection (a)(v) of this section because the mother willfully allowed the child to remain in the custody of the Wyoming Department of Family Services (DFS) for the year immediately preceding the filing of the adoption petition without substantially contributing to his support, and physical placement of the child with his grandfather would not have removed the child from DFS's legal custody. The TF v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re CF), 2005 WY 118, 120 P.3d 992,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2005).

Only substantial or regular contributions by nonconsenting
parent prevent adoption. —

Contributions which are necessary by the nonconsenting parent to prevent adoption without his consent pursuant to subsection (a)(iv) must be substantial or regular, or constitute a material factor in the child's support. In re Adoption of CCT, 640 P.2d 73,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1982).

Petition filed prematurely dismissed. —

Where the child's natural father first became delinquent on December 1, 1988 or a reasonably short time thereafter, a petition to adopt without consent filed on November 7, 1989, was at least three weeks premature, and therefore subject to dismissal. In re Adoption of SLS, 808 P.2d 207,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1991).

“Maintenance by” the Wyoming department of public welfare

(now division of public assistance and social services) does not bring adoption case under this section, since language of section refers to “maintenance in.” In re Adoption of Narragon, 530 P.2d 413,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1975).

One seeking the adoption of another's child without his consent must, under the circumstances of this case, allege and prove not only his nonsupport, if able, for the prescribed period but also willful abandonment. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Legislative intent. —

The legislature with good reason wished to preserve the abandonment concept as additional to the mere failure to support; they are not synonymous. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

The natural parent must not be excluded,

if his or her role can be consistently continued. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Not necessary to obtain consent of natural parent convicted
of illicit sexual relations. —

Because of the natural father's conviction of taking indecent liberties, incest, and illicit sexual relations, he was adjudged guilty of cruelty, abuse and mistreatment of his daughter, and it was not necessary to obtain his consent in order that his daughter be adopted. In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985).

And parent excludable from hearing on merits of petition to
adopt. —

A determination by the district court that the natural father's consent to adopt was not required effectively terminated his parental rights to his daughter. After this determination, he was, in effect, a stranger to the adoption proceedings. The court did not abuse its discretion in bifurcating the proceedings and excluding him from the hearing on the merits of the petition to adopt. In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985).

Construction of former § 1-710.2. —

This section is poorly written and ungrammatical. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

This section is grammatically incorrect when subsection (c) is read with the opening phrase of the statute, thus: “An adoption may be decreed without the written consent of the parent or parents of the child sought to be adopted where said nonconsenting mother or father: (c) who [sic] has willfully abandoned such child.” In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

The series of alternatives was interrupted by the absence of the word “or” between subsections (c) and (d) and so joinder of (c) and (d) must have been intended. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Since the word “or” is absent, subsections (c) and (d) are not separate and not alternatives. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

The supreme court could not say that there is clerical error in omission of “or” at the end of subsection (c). In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

The introductory language of this section and subsection (d) would make sense and avoid a seeming lack of connection if the words were rearranged as follows: place the words “has not contributed to the support of said child during a period of one (1) year immediately prior to the filing of the petition for adoption” at the beginning of the subsection, followed by “if it is proven to the satisfaction of the court that said father or mother, if able, or.” In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

If the word “who” was left out, and it does serve no useful purpose, subsection (c) would be able to stand alone. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Subsections (a), (b) and (e) can be read separately with the opening of the section. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Subsections (c) and (d) must be read and considered together since the conjunctive “or” does not appear following (c) as it does following each of the other conditions which must exist in the alternative before a parent loses his rights of parenthood. In re Adoption of Voss, 550 P.2d 481,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1976).

Applied

in

GWJ v. MH, 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Cranston v. Cranston, 879 P.2d 345,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

In re Parental Rights of SCN, 659 P.2d 568,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

In re Adoption of P., 583 P.2d 706,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1978); State ex rel. TRL v. RLP, 772 P.2d 1054,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1989); BDR v. BEB, 888 P.2d 216,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1995); EBH v. Hot Springs Dep't of Family Servs., 2001 WY 100, 33 P.3d 172,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For a note dealing with adoption of children without parental consent, see 7 Wyo. L.J. 41.

See “The Status of Legal Abandonment in Wyoming,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 205.

See “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

See “Observations and Suggestions Concerning Wyoming Statutes Relating to Adoption Based on Abandonment,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 218.

For comment, “Wyoming's New Termination of Parental Rights Statute,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 621 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity of consent of parent under statute providing for adoption of abandoned or deserted child, 35 ALR2d 662.

Parent's involuntary confinement, or failure to care for child as result thereof, as permitting adoption without parental consent, 78 ALR3d 712.

Comment note: Natural parent's indigence as precluding finding that failure to support child waived requirement of consent to adoption — general principles, 82 ALR5th 443.

Natural parent's indigence resulting from unemployment or underemployment as precluding finding that failure to support child waived requirement of consent to adoption, 83 ALR5th 375.

Natural parent's indigence as precluding finding that failure to support child waived requirement of consent to adoption — Factors other than employment status, 84 ALR5th 191.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice §§ 64.11, 64.20 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-22-111.
Decree; investigation; denial of adoption.

After the petition to adopt has been filed and a hearing held the court acting in the best interest and welfare of the child may make any of the following orders:

Enter an interlocutory decree of adoption giving the care and custody of the child to the petitioners pending further order of the court;

Defer entry of an interlocutory decree of adoption and order the department of family services or a private licensed agency to investigate and report to the court the background of the child and of the petitioners, and the medical, social and psychological background and status of the consenting parent and putative father. After a written report of the investigation is filed, the court shall determine if the adoption by petitioners is in the best interest and welfare of the child and thereupon enter the appropriate order or decree;

Enter a final decree of adoption if the child has resided in the home of the petitioner for six (6) months; or

Deny the adoption if the court finds that the best interests and welfare of the child will be served by such denial.

If the court denies the adoption it shall make an order for proper custody consistent with the best interest and welfare of the child.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 2, § 3; Laws 1882, ch. 26, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 2276; R.S. 1899, § 3017; C.S. 1910, § 3954; C.S. 1920, § 5020; R.S. 1931, § 20-206; C.S. 1945, § 58-203; Laws 1955, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-711, 1-726.11; Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 11; 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Subject matter jurisdiction.—

Adoption statutes did not preclude the district court from ordering a Wyoming adoption decree recognizing or approving a Hague Convention adoption certificate. Reading the broad language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-22-111

, with the express statutory language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-1-417(e), the adoption statutes allowed district courts to approve adoptions of children born in a foreign country and to enter a report of a Wyoming adoption. As a result, the district court erred in dismissing petitioners’ petition for an order of adoption. In re Adoption of Majb, 2020 WY 157, 478 P.3d 196,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2020).

Adoption petition denied.—

District court did not abuse its discretion in denying a petition filed by a mother and stepfather to adopt a child because it carefully weighed conflicting evidence, determined credibility, and came to a reasonable conclusion; the district court specifically considered the willfulness of the father’s failure to financially support the child, and despite that evidence, it concluded other factors outweighed those concerns under the circumstances. JEG v. BCB (In re ZEM), 2020 WY 17, 458 P.3d 21,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2020).

Statutory noncompliance asserted where decree interlocutory.
—

An adoptive parent was not estopped from asserting noncompliance by the district court with the adoption statute, because the court's adoption decree was interlocutory, and not final, the children not having resided in the home of petitioner for six months as required for entry of a final decree of adoption. In re Adoption of AMD, 766 P.2d 550,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Informal record. —

Record of judge on detached piece of paper, found among papers of his office was sufficient. Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1893).

Applied

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948).

Quoted

in

In re Adoption of Female Child X, 537 P.2d 719,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1975); In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982).

Stated

in

In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 20 L.R.A. 199 (1893); Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003); Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(2005); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Family Law — Contested Consent to Adoption: No Longer a Decision in the Child's Best Interest. In re Adoption of BGD, 713 P.2d 1191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 203 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of res judicata to decrees or judgment in adoption proceedings, 52 ALR2d 406.

Race as factor in adoption proceedings, 34 ALR4th 167.

§ 1-22-112.
Application for final decree.

If an interlocutory decree has been entered petitioners may apply for a final decree of adoption after the child has resided in the home of the petitioners for six (6) months and a hearing on the petition may be required.

If an interlocutory decree has not been entered a hearing on the petition for a final decree of adoption shall be set as provided in W.S.

1-22-106

, notice thereof shall be given as provided in W.S.

1-22-107

and a final hearing shall be had on the petition.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 51, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 58-209; W.S. 1957, § 1-711.2, 1-715, 1-726.12; Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 13; 1965, ch. 11, § 1; 1969, ch. 40, § 1; 1977, ch. 187, § 1.

Statutory noncompliance asserted where decree interlocutory.
—

An adoptive parent was not estopped from asserting noncompliance by the district court with the adoption statute, because the court's adoption decree was interlocutory, and not final, the children not having resided in the home of petitioner for six months as required for entry of a final decree of adoption. In re Adoption of AMD, 766 P.2d 550,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

A substantial compliance with this section is sufficient

and that does not require a child to be kept as a prisoner for the six months' residential period. In re Adoption of Hiatt, 69 Wyo. 373, 242 P.2d 214,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1952).

Evidence supporting finding of residence in home of petitioners.
—

Where trial court found that adopting parents had absolute care, custody, support and control of minor child and had taken care of him the same as if he were their own natural born son, there was substantial evidence showing that trial court was warranted in finding that the minor child was a bona fide resident in the home of the adopting parents within the meaning of this section. In re Adoption of Hiatt, 69 Wyo. 373, 242 P.2d 214,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1952).

Stated

in

In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948).

Law reviews. —

See “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

§ 1-22-113.
Petition for adoption of an adult; consent required.

When a petition to adopt
an adult is filed a copy of the petition together with a summons issued
as in other civil actions shall be served on the adult. If the adult
objects to adoption by the petitioner the petition shall be dismissed.
When the consent of the adult is given, the petition shall be granted
and a final decree of adoption made and entered. The decree may change
the name of the adopted person.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 83, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-726, 1-726.13; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to change of name in adoption proceedings, see §

1-25-104

.

It is the adoptee that is required to consent to the adoption

under this section, and not the parents. Pangarova v. Nichols, 419 P.2d 688,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1966).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adoption of adult, 21 ALR3d 1012.

Marital or sexual relationship between parties as affecting right to adopt, 42 ALR4th 776.